Washington statutes.
RCW 25.05.580

Registered agent—Designation and maintenance.

A foreign limited liability partnership shall designate and continuously maintain in this state a registered agent in accordance with Article 4 of chapter 23.95 RCW.

[ 2015 c 176 s 5117; 2009 c 437 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.